Indiana, session 2026, HB1242.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-30-21 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 21. (a) The department of local government finance,
in consultation with the department of education (established by
IC 20-19-3-1), shall conduct a study of the disparities in per student
operational funding amounts in school corporations (as defined in
IC 20-18-2-16(a)).
(b) The study required under subsection (a) must include the
following:
(1) A comparison of per student operational funding levels for
school corporations within each county.
(2) An identification of the median per student operational
funding level for schools within each county.
(3) An analysis of the extent to which local property tax gross
assessed values contribute to funding disparities among
schools within a county.
(4) An estimate of the amount of additional funding that
would be required to bring schools with per student
operational funding below a median level up to the median
level.
(c) The department of local government finance must use the
most recent data available from the department of education
HEA 1242 — Concur

2
(established by IC 20-19-3-1) and the state department of revenue
in carrying out the requirements of subsection (b).
(d) Not later than December 1, 2026, the department of local
government finance shall submit the report required under
subsection (a), in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6, to the
legislative council and the state budget committee.
(e) This section expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. IC 20-19-3-41.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 41.3. (a) The department shall
prepare a report compiling statewide data on school corporations
and charter schools. The report must include the following
information:
(1) The total number of school corporations and charter
schools in Indiana disaggregated by:
(A) county population;
(B) the number of school corporations and charter schools
per county; and
(C) the number of students enrolled in each school
corporation and charter school.
(2) Data regarding chronic absenteeism rates, performance on
the statewide assessment program, performance on the
determinant evaluation of reading skills approved by the state
board, and teacher salaries, disaggregated by:
(A) county population;
(B) the number of school corporations and charter schools
per county; and
(C) the number of students enrolled in each school
corporation and charter school.
(3) Recommendations to:
(A) increase school corporation and charter school
administrative efficiencies;
(B) reduce school corporation and charter school
administrative costs; and
(C) improve student outcomes.
(b) Not later than December 1, 2026, the department shall, in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6, submit the report prepared
under subsection (a) to the:
(1) legislative council; and
(2) interim study committee on education established by
IC 2-5-1.3-4.
(c) This section expires December 31, 2026.
HEA 1242 — Concur

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1242 — Concur